Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4109
Public Guardian; duties.

Consistent
with the purposes and objectives of the Public Guardianship Act and in consultation
with the council, the Public Guardian shall:

(1) Develop
a uniform system of reporting and collecting statistical data regarding guardianships
and conservatorships;

(2) Develop and adopt a standard of practice and code of ethics
for public guardianship and public conservatorship;

(3) Prepare a biennial
budget for the implementation of the act;

(4) Develop guidelines for a sliding scale
of fees to be charged for public guardianship and public conservatorship services;

(5) Maintain,
in conjunction with private and other public resources, a curricula for training
sessions to be made available for successor guardians and successor conservators
and private guardians and private conservators;

(6) Maintain training
programs available statewide to offer the training curricula for interested
parties to include:

(a) Helping a guardian understand his or her ward's disabilities
and a conservator understand his or her fiduciary duties with respect to his
or her protected person;

(b) Helping a guardian encourage increased independence on the part
of his or her ward, as appropriate;

(c) Helping a guardian with the preparation
and revision of guardianship plans and reports and a conservator with the
preparation and revision of accountings; and

(d) Advising a guardian
or conservator on ways to secure rights, benefits, and services to which his
or her ward or protected person is entitled;

(7) Promote public awareness
of guardianship and conservatorship, the responsibilities attached, and the
need for more private guardians and private conservators; and

(8) Apply for
and receive funds from public and private sources for carrying out the purposes
and obligations of the act.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 9.